Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1514
Denial of support; hearing provided.

The chief executive officer of the department, or his or her designated representative, shall provide an opportunity for a fair hearing to any family or disabled person who is denied support pursuant to the Disabled Persons and Family Support Act.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 355;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 73;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 287.